test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nouns_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - fill - ok : # -m animate noun
    fille+N+Fem+C1+Nom+Sg: fille # this is a comment
    fille+N+Fem+C1+Obl+Sg: fille #
    fille+N+Fem+C1+Nom+Pl: filles #
    fille+N+Fem+C1+Obl+Pl: filles #

  Noun - vertut - ok : #
    vertut+N+Fem+C2+Nom+Sg: vertut #
    vertut+N+Fem+C2+Obl+Sg: vertut #
    vertut+N+Fem+C2+Nom+Pl: vertuts #
    vertut+N+Fem+C2+Obl+Pl: vertuts #

  Noun - serour - ok : #
    serour+N+Fem+C3+Nom+Sg: serour #
    serour+N+Fem+C3+Obl+Sg: serour #
    serour+N+Fem+C3+Nom+Pl: serours #
    serour+N+Fem+C3+Obl+Pl: serours #
